src-fst-morphology-stems-exceptions.lexc.md
Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

IRREGULAR ADJECTIVES

IRREGULAR DETERMINERS

IRREGULAR NOUNS

Some verbs have variant forms:

* variant forms examples:*
* *leämmaž:* `leeʹd+V+PrfPrc`
* *leämma:* `leeʹd+V+PrfPrc`

The verb of negation
* **iʹlla+V: NEG-COPULA ;** This is for 3rd person iʹlla 

PREFIXES for nouns

Spelling errors

Foreign words

FROM FORMER .lexc CONTENT

# Skolt Saami adjectives

OUR LONG-TERM GOAL IS NOT TO ADD STEMS MANUALLY TO THIS FILE
Instead we want to update the dictionary sms2X/src/a_sms2X.xml, 
from where the present lexc files will be regularly updated by 
exporting (we need a script for this).

# Skolt Saami adpositions

# Skolt Saami adverbs

# Skolt Saami Conjunctions 

The lexicon *Conjunction* lists the conjunction

# Skolt Saami Interjections 

The lexicon *ij* gives the tag **+Interj**

The lexicon *Interjection* lists the interjections
* ai ij ;            

# Skolt Saami Particles

## List of particles in the lexicon Particle

ges+Pcle:ges PCLE_ ; 

# Propernoun lexicon, Skolt Sámi specific names 

# Subjunctions

The lexicon *Subjunction* lists the subjunctions
* So far it contains only go+CS:go CS_ ;  

# Verb roots

Here are the verb types so far:

*   5 JURDDED
*  38 KALMMED
*   3 KAMRDED
*   1 LAADDAD
*   1 LEED
*  23 MAINSTED
*   4 SEDGGJED
*   8 V_SILTTEED
*   5 V_SOLLEED
*  18 V_TEEʹMEED
*  53 TEEVVAD
*  25 TIETTED
*  82 VIQQAD
*   7 VOLLJED
*   4 VOOIDAD
*   1 VUEJTED

# TEST WORDS BEYOND THIS POINT
DO NOT ADD TRANSLATIONS
DO NOT ADD NOTES

# Skolt Saami Numerals

Lexicon *Subjunction* contains *okta* only.
CODED BY JACK

BUT have most of their Contlex values THIS has a separate DB DON'T TRANSLATE

From excel 2024-11-03

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc)</small>
